California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

17378.

After the hearing, the board of directors of the annexing district may adopt a resolution ordering and approving the annexation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17379.

The annexing board shall by resolution describe the territory ordered to be annexed, and set forth the boundaries of the district as they will exist after the annexation. The order shall also set forth in detail the terms and conditions, if any, of the annexation; and if the annexation is for limited purposes only, the land which is being annexed shall be described as one parcel and the land of the annexing district shall be described as a separate and distinct parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17380.

After adoption of the resolution ordering the annexation, the secretary of the annexing district shall make the filings provided for in Chapter 8 (commencing at Section 56450, Government Code) of Part 5 of the District Reorganization Act of 1965. A certified copy of the resolution provided for by Section 17379 shall accompany and be made a part of such filings. The annexation shall be completed and effective on the dates specified in said Chapter 8.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

17381.

The inclusion in, or annexation or addition to, a public utility district of the corporate area of any public corporation or public agency shall not destroy the identity or legal existence or impair the powers of any such public corporation or public agency, notwithstanding the identity of purpose, or substantial identity of purpose, of such public utility district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Exclusion of Territory [17501. - 17501.]

17501.

Any territory within a district which is not benefited in any manner by the district or its continued inclusion therein may be excluded from the district by proceedings under and pursuant to the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Zones in Districts in Lake Tahoe Basin [18050. - 18055.]

18050.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any public utility district in the Lake Tahoe Basin which has provided or undertaken to provide a sewer system and treatment facilities which transport or are intended to transport any resultant sewage effluent outside the Lake Tahoe Basin, may form zones and issue zone bonds for the purpose of financing the costs of interceptor trunk sewers, force mains, pumping stations and appurtenant structures in the zone which, in the opinion of its board of directors, are necessary or useful in connecting local sewerage collection systems to the major sewerage works and system of the district, or which are necessary or useful in causing local
 areas to install sewerage collection systems, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

18051.

(a) The zones authorized by this chapter shall be formed in the same manner as assessment districts are formed pursuant to the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000), Streets and Highways Code).

(b) The resolution of intention to form a zone shall briefly describe the proposed improvement, specify the exterior boundaries of the zone, and specify the maximum amount of zone bonds to be issued to finance the proposed improvement.

(c) Upon the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of
 intention and the adoption of the resolution declaring the zone formed, the board of directors of the district may proceed with the issuance of zone bonds, not exceeding the amount specified in the resolution of intention, and with the construction of the proposed improvement. The board may exercise any and all powers of the district in the zone necessary to construct the proposed improvement.

The board shall formulate the proposition to issue zone bonds and shall conduct an election in the zone affected in the same manner as for bonds of the district pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 16801), Chapter 5 of this division. An affirmative vote of two-thirds of the electors voting in the zone is necessary to issue zone bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

18052.

Bonds of a zone formed pursuant to this chapter shall be issued in the amount of the costs of the improvements of the zone, notwithstanding Section 16573, payable in 25 or less serial annual amounts, and shall be in the same form, payable in the same manner, and be of the same effect as bonds of the district issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17001) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

18054.

The board shall annually, at the time of levying taxes for general district purposes, fix a rate of ad valorem tax upon the taxable real property in the zone created therefor, sufficient to pay the zone bond principal and interest as they become due before the proceeds of another such levy shall be available therefor, and such tax shall be levied, collected and money collected therefrom shall be expended to pay zone bonds principal and interest, in the same manner and with the same effect as taxes levied to pay bonds of the district pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 16641), Chapter 4 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

18055.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that special facts exist with respect to public utility districts in the Lake Tahoe Basin which require the enactment of this chapter, applicable only to such districts. The special facts are as follows:

(a) There is an urgent need for immediate action in providing an adequate system of sewer treatment and export facilities in order to prevent the pollution of the waters of Lake Tahoe.

(b) There are areas in these districts which are and will continue to be required to install sewerage collection systems
 which cannot now be connected to the major sewerage works and system of the districts.

(c) All areas of these districts are being required to connect to and use the works and system of the districts where they are available to them, but there is no economical means of providing the necessary intervening facilities which will be inviting to the owners of said areas to provide said facilities.

(d) The procedure provided in this chapter will stimulate and engender said purpose and thus help to bring about an early solution to the Lake Tahoe water pollution problem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. AVIATION [21001. - 24451.]



PART 1. STATE AERONAUTICS ACT [21001. - 21712.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [21001. - 21020.]

21001.

This part may be cited as the “State Aeronautics Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2071.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.

The purpose of this part is to further and protect the public interest in aeronautics and aeronautical progress by the following means:

(a) Encouraging the development of private flying and the general use of air transportation.

(b) Fostering and promoting safety in aeronautics.

(c) Effecting uniformity of the laws and regulations relating to aeronautics consistent with federal aeronautics laws and regulations.

(d) Granting to a state agency powers, and imposing upon it duties, so that the state may properly perform its functions relative to aeronautics and effectively exercise its jurisdiction over persons and property, assist in the development of a statewide system of airports, encourage the flow of private capital into aviation facilities, and cooperate with and assist political subdivisions and others engaged in aeronautics in the development and encouragement of aeronautics. 

(e) Establishing only those regulations which are essential and clearly within the scope of the authority granted by the Legislature, in order that persons may engage in every phase of aeronautics with the least possible restriction consistent with the safety and the rights of others.

(f) Providing for cooperation with the federal authorities in the development of a national system of civil aviation and for coordination of the aeronautical activities of those authorities and the authorities of this state.

(g) Assuring that persons residing in the vicinity of airports are protected to the greatest possible extent against intrusions by unreasonable levels of aircraft noise.

(h) Fostering and promoting the development of a stable and efficient regional air carrier system to provide access for small and rural communities to the national air transportation system consistent with federal policies favoring deregulation.

(i) Developing, in cooperation with the private sector, airport management, local jurisdictions, federal authorities, and the general public, informational programs to increase the understanding of current air transportation issues including, but not limited to, aviation safety, planning, airport noise, airport development and management, and the role of aviation in the economic development of the state, as an integral part of the state’s transportation system.

(j) Sponsoring or cosponsoring, with representatives of the aerospace and aviation industry, aviation educational and informational seminars which meet the needs of pilots and other members of the industry for current information on aviation safety, planning, and airport development and management.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21004.

The acquisition of any land or interest therein pursuant to this part, the planning, acquisition, establishment, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation of airports and air navigation facilities, whether by the state separately or jointly with any political subdivision, and the exercise of any other powers granted to the department by this part are public and governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose, and are matters of public necessity. All land and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of the state pursuant to this part are acquired and used for public and governmental purposes as a matter of public necessity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21005.

This part shall not be construed as limiting any power of the state or a political subdivision to regulate airport hazards by zoning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

21006.

This chapter or any other law shall not be construed as prohibiting, restricting, or permitting the prohibition of the operation or landing in populated areas of helicopters and similar aircraft capable of approximately vertical ascent and descent, subject to such reasonable rules affecting the public safety as the department may promulgate. The department shall adopt rules and regulations, effective January 1, 1989, for the conditions under which helicopters may make temporary use of a landing site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21006.5.

“Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1253.)
-------------------------------------------

21007.

Whenever the term “California Aeronautics Commission,” “Division of Aeronautics,” or “Department of Aeronautics” is used in any other law, it means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 725, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21008.

“Director” means the Director of Transportation.

Any reference in any law or regulation to the Director of Aeronautics shall be deemed to refer to the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1253.)
-------------------------------------------

21008.3.

“Division” means the Division of Aeronautics in the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1149, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21008.5.

“Commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 725, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

21009.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 220.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21010.

“Political subdivision” means any county, city, city and county, public corporation, district or other political entity or public corporation of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21011.

“Aeronautics” means:

(a) The science and art of flight, including transportation by aircraft.

(b) The operation, construction, repair, or maintenance of aircraft and aircraft power plants and accessories, including the repair, packing, and maintenance of parachutes.

(c) The design, establishment, construction, extension, operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of airports or other air navigation facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21012.

“Aircraft” means any manned contrivance used or designed for navigation of, or flight in, the air requiring certification and registration as prescribed by federal statute or regulation. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, manned lighter-than-air balloons and ultralight vehicles as defined in the regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration (14 C.F.R. Part 103), whether or not certificated by the Federal Aviation Administration, shall not be considered to be aircraft for purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective February 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

21013.

“Airport” means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for use, for the landing and take-off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights of way, and all airport buildings and facilities located thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21014.

“Air navigation facility” means any facility, other than facilities owned or operated by the United States, used, or available or designed for use, in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other facilities used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21015.

“Operation of aircraft” or “operate aircraft” means the use, navigation, or piloting of aircraft in the air space over this State or upon any airport within this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21016.

“Airman” means any individual who engages, as the person in command, or as pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew, in the navigation of aircraft while under way, and any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances, and any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher, or air traffic control-tower operator. “Airman” does not include any individual employed outside the United States, or any individual employed by a manufacturer of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances to perform duties as inspector or mechanic in connection therewith, or any individual performing inspection or mechanical duties in connection with aircraft owned or operated by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21017.

“Airport hazard” means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land, which obstructs the air space required for flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or which is otherwise hazardous to the landing or taking off.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21018.

“Airway” means a route in the navigable air space over the land or waters of this State, designated by proper authority as a route suitable for air navigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

21019.

A person who violates this part, other than Section 21407.1 or Section 21709, or any of the rules or orders issued under this part, is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment of not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   (AB 295)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21020.

“Land” includes tide and submerged lands or other lands subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Department of Transportation and State Aeronautics Board [21204. - 21258.]



  ARTICLE 1. Department of Transportation [21204. - 21207.]

21204.

The department may adopt, administer, and enforce rules and regulations for the administration of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.

The department shall prepare a statement of all estimated revenues of the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund and revenues available for local subventions from any other sources for the next succeeding fiscal year, together with a statement of proposed expenditures to be made to local agencies and the University of California during the next succeeding fiscal year, or obligations to be incurred in connection therewith.

The statement shall be included in the printed fiscal year budget submitted to the Legislature. Insofar as the matters to which it pertains, it shall constitute as submitted the budget submitted to the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 13320 of the Government Code, and, as to such matters, shall be administered by the Department of Finance as the fiscal year budget of the Department of Transportation under the provisions of this section and of Article 2 (commencing with Section 13320) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Any changes or modifications in the budget described in this section shall be approved by the Director of Finance.

In the event, during an annual period, the budgetary amount approved and allocated for any purpose exceeds the amount actually necessary therefor, with a resultant available surplus, such surplus may be allocated to any other purpose or supplemental project upon the written approval of the Director of Finance.

In administering the budget, the Director of Finance shall not limit expenditures or incurrence of obligations thereunder to quarterly, semiannual, or other periods of the fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 725, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21207.

Whenever a political subdivision owning and operating an airport constructs or implements a noise mitigation project at the airport, including, but not limited to, the installation of noise monitoring equipment at any time after the project has been included within the aeronautics program in the state transportation improvement program and prior to funding of the project, the department shall, when funding for the project becomes available, reimburse the political subdivision for the eligible costs of the project, without interest, not to exceed the amount of the funds made available to the department or the political subdivision’s actual eligible costs, whichever is lower. Reimbursement under this section shall be made only if the political subdivision completes the project to the standards approved by the department including, but not limited to, bidding and contracting procedures and the project is approved by the commission. This section does not apply to any project for which state funding is not specifically made available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 901, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. State Aeronautics Board [21215. - 21216.]

21215.

(a) The State Aeronautics Board is hereby abolished, and the California Transportation Commission succeeds to, and is vested with, all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction vested in the State Aeronautics Board.

(b) Any reference in any law or regulation to the State Aeronautics Board shall be deemed to refer to the California Transportation Commission.

(c) The California Transportation Commission shall have the possession and control of all licenses, permits, leases, agreements, contracts, orders, claims, judgments, records, papers, equipment, supplies, bonds, moneys, funds, appropriations, buildings, land and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit, use, or obligation of the State Aeronautics Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

21216.

Any person or entity injured or aggrieved by any procedure or action of the department with respect to aeronautics may appeal to the California Transportation Commission for relief, and the decision of the commission as to such matter shall, after hearing thereon, be conclusive, subject to such review as may be otherwise provided by law. This section shall not apply to any procedure or action for which a hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is specified in this part as the means for reviewing or finalizing the procedure or action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 511.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [21240. - 21258.]

21240.

This state recognizes the authority of the federal government to regulate the operation of aircraft and to control the use of the airways, and nothing in this act shall be construed to give the department the power to so regulate and control safety factors in the operation of aircraft or to control use of the airways. This section does not affect the state’s power to regulate the intrastate rates of common carriers by air, and such power is hereby reserved to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21241.

The department shall encourage, foster, and assist in the development of aeronautics in this state and encourage the establishment of airports and air navigation facilities. It shall cooperate with and assist the federal government, political subdivisions of this state, and others in the development of aeronautics, and shall seek to coordinate their aeronautical activities.

Political subdivisions may cooperate with the department in the development of aeronautics and aeronautics facilities in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21242.

The department may:

(a) Draft and recommend necessary legislation to advance the interest of the state in aeronautics.

(b) Represent the state in aeronautical matters before federal and other agencies.

(c) Participate as plaintiff or defendant or as intervenor on behalf of the state or any political subdivision or citizen in any controversy which involves the interest of the state in aeronautics.

(d) Assist political subdivisions and their law enforcement agencies in becoming acquainted with and enforcing the civil air regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21243.

The department may make and amend general or special rules, regulations, and procedures and establish minimum standards, consistent with and clearly within the scope of federal legislation governing aeronautics and the rules, regulations, and standards issued thereunder. The department may, by regulation, classify airports into several reasonable classes or groups according to their facilities and the types and number of aircraft which they are capable of handling and may make and amend rules, regulations, and procedures and establish minimum standards for each separate class or group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21244.

For the purpose of protecting and insuring the general public interest and safety and the safety of persons operating, using, or traveling in aircraft and developing aeronautics in this state, and after appropriate public hearings, the department may make and amend temporary general or special rules and procedures and establish temporary minimum standards consistent with this part as it deems necessary to administer this part. The department shall draft these temporary rules, procedures, and standards in the form of proposed aviation law and shall submit them to the next general session of the Legislature. These temporary rules, procedures, and standards shall not remain in effect beyond 90 days after the final adjournment of that session of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21245.

The department shall keep on file with the Secretary of State, and at its principal office, a copy of all its rules for public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21246.

The department shall provide for the publication and general distribution of all its orders, rules, and procedures having general effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21247.

The department may enter into any contracts necessary to the execution of its powers under this part. All contracts made by the department, either as the agent of the state or as the agent of any political subdivision, shall be made pursuant to the laws of the state governing the making of like contracts. Where the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of any airport or air navigation facility is financed wholly or partially with federal money the department, as agent of the state or of any political subdivision, may let contracts in the manner prescribed by the federal authorities acting under the laws of the United States and any rules made thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21248.

The department may exercise any of its powers under this part jointly with any political subdivision, state agency, other states or their political subdivisions, or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21249.

The department may confer or hold joint hearings with any federal agency in connection with any matter arising under this part or relating to the sound development of aeronautics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21250.

The department may avail itself of the cooperation, services, records, and facilities of the federal agencies in the administration and enforcement of this part. It shall cooperate with and make available to the federal agencies, its services, records, and facilities, insofar as practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21251.

In administering this part the department may use the facilities and services of other state agencies and political subdivisions to the utmost extent possible. These agencies and political subdivisions shall make available to the department their facilities and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21252.

(a) (1) The department, its members, the director, officers and employees of the department, and every state and peace officer charged with the enforcement of state and subordinate laws or ordinances, may enforce and assist in the enforcement of this part, the rules and orders issued under this part, and all other laws of this state relating to aeronautics. In the enforcement of these rules, orders, and laws, the director, and any officers and employees as the director may designate, shall have the authority, as public officers, to arrest without a warrant, any person who, in his presence, has violated, or as to whom there is probable cause to believe has violated, any of the rules, orders, or laws.

(2) In any case in which an arrest authorized by this subdivision is made for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor, and the person arrested does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, the arresting officer may, instead of taking that person before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The provisions of that chapter shall thereafter apply with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(b) There shall not be civil liability on the part of, and a cause of action shall not arise against, any person, acting pursuant to subdivision (a) and within the scope of his authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of any arrest that is lawful or for which the arresting officer, at the time of the arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful. The officer shall not be
 deemed an aggressor or lose his right to self-defense by the use of reasonable force to effect the arrest or to prevent escape or to overcome resistance.

(c) The director, and any officers and employees as the director may designate, may serve all processes and notices throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 272.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21253.

In the name of the state, the department may enforce this part and rules and orders issued under this part by injunction or other legal process in the courts of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21254.

The department may report to the appropriate federal agencies and agencies of other states all proceedings instituted charging violations of Section 21407, and Sections 21409 to 21412, inclusive, and all penalties of which it has knowledge imposed upon airmen or the owners or operators of aircraft for violations of the law of this state relating to aeronautics or for violations of the rules or orders of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21255.

The department may receive reports of penalties and other data from agencies of the federal government and other states, and may enter into agreements with these agencies governing the delivery, receipt, exchange, and use of reports and data. The department may make the reports and data of these agencies and of the courts of this state available to any court of this state and to any officer of the state or of any political subdivision authorized to enforce the aeronautics laws by Section 21252.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21256.

The department may accept, receive, receipt for, disburse, and expend federal and other money, public or private, made available to accomplish in whole or in part any of the purposes of this part. All federal money accepted under this part shall be accepted and expended by the department upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the United States. In accepting federal money under this part, the department shall have the same authority to enter into contracts on behalf of the state as is granted to the department under Section 21603. The department shall deposit all money received under this section in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury, to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions upon which it was made available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21257.

The department may own and operate aircraft for use in the furtherance of its duties, employ airmen and mechanics for proper operation and maintenance of the aircraft, and insure its employees against injury or death arising from aircraft accidents incurred in the performance of their assigned duties, within the limits of appropriations for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21258.

The department shall represent the state and local agencies before the Civil Aeronautics Board and other federal agencies in all matters related to the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-504, as amended) and the essential air service program created by that act. The department shall assist and cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies and private entities in the development of a stable and efficient regional air carrier system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Regulation of Aeronautics [21401. - 21416.]

21401.

Sovereignty in the space above the land and waters of this state rests in the state, except where granted to and assumed by the United States pursuant to a constitutional grant from the people of the state.

The operation of aircraft in such space is a privilege subject to the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

21402.

The ownership of the space above the land and waters of this State is vested in the several owners of the surface beneath, subject to the right of flight described in Section 21403. No use shall be made of such airspace which would interfere with such right of flight; provided, that any use of property in conformity with an original zone of approach of an airport shall not be rendered unlawful by reason of a change in such zone of approach.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1651.)
-------------------------------------------

21403.

(a) Flight in aircraft over the land and waters of this state is lawful, unless at altitudes below those prescribed by federal authority, or unless conducted so as to be imminently dangerous to persons or property lawfully on the land or water beneath. The landing of an aircraft on the land or waters of another, without his or her consent, is unlawful except in the case of a forced landing or pursuant to Section 21662.1. The owner, lessee, or operator of the aircraft is liable, as provided by law, for damages caused by a forced landing.

(b) The landing, takeoff, or taxiing of an aircraft on a public freeway, highway, road, or street is unlawful except in the following cases:

(1) A forced landing.

(2) A landing during a natural disaster or other public emergency if the landing has received prior approval from the public agency having primary jurisdiction over traffic upon the freeway, highway, road, or street.

(3) When the landing, takeoff, or taxiing has received prior approval from the public agency having primary jurisdiction over traffic upon the freeway, highway, road or street.

The prosecution bears the burden of proving that none of the exceptions apply to the act which is alleged to be unlawful.

(c) The right of flight in aircraft includes the right of safe access to public airports, which includes the right of flight within the zone of approach of any public airport without restriction or hazard. The zone of approach of an airport shall conform to the specifications of Part 77 of the Federal Aviation Regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration, Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1215, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21404.

Liability of the owner or pilot of an aircraft carrying passengers for injury or death to the passengers is determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on the land or waters of this state, arising out of similar relationships. Every owner of an aircraft is liable and responsible for death or injury to person or property resulting from a negligent or wrongful act or omission in the operation of the aircraft, in the business of the owner or otherwise, by any person using or operating the same with the permission, express or implied, of the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

21404.1.

(a) The liability of an owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent imposed by Section 21404 and not arising through the relationship of principal and agent or master and servant is limited to the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for the death of or injury to one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit as to one person, is limited to the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for the death of or injury to more than one person in any one accident and is limited to the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for damage to property of others in any one accident.

(b) An owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent is not liable under this section for damages imposed for the sake of example and by way of punishing the operator of the aircraft. Nothing in this subdivision makes an owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative immune from liability for damages imposed for the sake of example and by way of punishing him for his own wrongful conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

21405.

The liability of the owner of one aircraft to the owner of another aircraft, or to operators or passengers on either aircraft, for damage caused by collision on land or in the air, is determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

21407.

It is unlawful for any person to operate an aircraft in the air, or on the ground or water in a careless or reckless manner so as to endanger the life or property of another. In any proceeding charging operation of aircraft in violation of this section, the court in determining whether the operation was careless or reckless shall consider the standards for safe operation of aircraft prescribed by federal statutes or regulations governing aeronautics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1094.)